italian.dict
confondere/ABFGKOUXY1
diffondere/ABFGKOUXY1
effondere/ABFGKOUXY1
fondere/ABFGKOUXY1
infondere/ABFGKOUXY1
radiodiffondere/ABFGKOUXY1
rifondere/ABFGKOUXY1
rimpossessato/F
riudire/ABFJKOSVY1
soffondere/ABFGKOUXY1
telediffondere/ABFGKOUXY1
udire/ABFJKOSVY1
